North Carolina, session 2025, SB292.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the Town of Grifton for
design and construction of flood mitigation and resiliency projects.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S292-v-1*